Washington statutes.
RCW 43.84.051

Management of permanent funds—Collection of interest, income and principal of securities—Disposition.

It shall be the duty of the state treasurer to collect the interest, or other income on, and the principal of the securities held in his or her custody pursuant to RCW 43.84.041 as the said sums become due and payable, and to pay the same when so collected into the respective funds to which the principal and interest shall accrue, less the allocation to the state treasurer's service account [fund] pursuant to RCW 43.08.190 and the state investment board expense account pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160.

[ 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 93; 1965 ex.s. c 104 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.